District of Columbia statutes.
8-2032

Pet ownership policy established.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the owner or operator of locally assisted housing accommodations for elderly persons or persons with disabilities shall not:

(1)

As a condition of tenancy or otherwise, prohibit or prevent an elderly tenant or tenant with a disability from owning common household pets or keeping common household pets in the rental unit of the tenant; or

(2)

Discriminate against any person in connection with admission to, or continued occupancy of, that rental unit by reason of the ownership of common household pets by that person or the presence of common household pets in the rental unit of that person.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-181, § 3, 35 DCR 7715
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 31(b), 53 DCR 6198
2001 Ed., § 8-2202.
1981 Ed., § 6-1022.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “elderly persons or persons with disabilities” for “the elderly or handicapped” and “tenant or tenant with a disability” for “or handicapped tenant”.